Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF4645.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2024, section 142F.101, is amended to read: 142F.101 ASSET LIMITATIONS FOR SUPPLEMENTAL NUTRITION ASSISTANCE PROGRAM HOUSEHOLDS. new text begin (a) new text end All Supplemental Nutrition Assistance Program (SNAP) households must be determined eligible for the benefit discussed under section 256.029. new text begin When applying for benefits, an applicant new text end SNAP deleted text begin householdsdeleted text end new text begin household new text end mustnew text begin :new text end new text begin (1) new text end demonstrate that their gross income is equal to or less than 200 percent of the federal poverty guidelines for the same family sizedeleted text begin .deleted text end new text begin ;new text end new text begin (2) attest in writing that the applicant meets the federal financial resource requirements under United States Code, title 7, section 2014(g), except that the household's financial resources may not exceed $20,000, and two licensed vehicles per household must be excluded from financial resource limits; new text end new text begin (3) attest to all of the applicant's liquid and nonliquid assets and their value, and all of the applicant's debt obligations and amounts. County agencies, in consultation with the Department of Children, Youth, and Families, shall refer applicants who have disclosed debt obligations and amounts to organizations of resources to help applicants manage financial obligations; new text end new text begin (4) attest whether the applicant's assets including land, equipment, and supplies are related to a farming operation; and new text end new text begin (5) attest whether the applicant has deferred or voluntarily delayed any form of payment in the last six months, including payments from Social Security or distributions from retirement accounts. An applicant who has deferred or voluntarily delayed payments from any source in the six months preceding the applicant's application is not eligible for SNAP benefits. new text end new text begin (b) Immediately upon receipt of an application, county agencies shall verify the written asset attestation of each applicant who received SNAP benefits for a total of 120 days in the previous calendar year. For an applicant who received SNAP benefits for fewer than 120 days in the previous calendar year, each month county agencies shall verify a random sample of the written asset attestations of applicants continuing to receive SNAP benefits 120 days after the date of application, according to the following schedule: new text end new text begin (1) one percent of applicants who have disclosed less than $5,000 in assets; new text end new text begin (2) two percent of applicants who have disclosed at least $5,000 but less than $10,000 in assets; new text end new text begin (3) five percent of applicants who have disclosed at least $10,000 but less than $15,000 in assets; and new text end new text begin (4) ten percent of applicants who have disclosed at least $15,000 but no more than $20,000 in assets. new text end new text begin (c) Applicants who continue to receive SNAP benefits after the 120-day verification must be verified according to the schedule for income verification. Applicants whose verified assets are related to agricultural business activities shall not be verified more than once every 36 months. new text end new text begin (d) The work requirement for able-bodied adults without dependents shall be set at the maximum allowed under federal law. new text end new text begin EFFECTIVE DATE. new text end new text begin This section is effective January 1, 2027, or upon federal approval, whichever is later. new text end Sec. 2. new text begin DIRECTION TO COMMISSIONER OF CHILDREN, YOUTH, AND FAMILIES.new text end new text begin To carry out the requirements under Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.101, the commissioner of children, youth, and families shall: new text end new text begin (1) seek all federal authority, including submitting all waiver applications, necessary to carry out the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.101; new text end new text begin (2) incorporate the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.101, into existing application forms and review processes; new text end new text begin (3) develop technical guidance for county agencies to implement, verify, and enforce the requirements in Minnesota Statutes, section 142F.101; and new text end new text begin (4) develop or identify organizations, resources, or other information for counties to refer applicants to for assistance with financial or debt management. new text end